Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,142
Smoke detectors; installation required; when.

(1) Every dwelling unit within a dwelling or apartment house constructed or remodeled on or after January 1, 1982, every guest room in a lodging house or hotel constructed or remodeled on or after January 1, 1982, and every dormitory constructed or remodeled on or after January 1, 1982, shall be provided with one or more operating smoke detectors meeting the requirements of the State Fire Marshal's rules and regulations.

(2) Every guest room in a lodging house or hotel constructed prior to January 1, 1982, and every dormitory constructed prior to January 1, 1982, shall be provided with one or more operating smoke detectors meeting the requirements of the State Fire Marshal's rules and regulations on or before January 1, 1984.

(3) Every (a) dwelling unit within a dwelling or apartment house constructed prior to January 1, 1982, (b) mobile home, and (c) modular housing unit constructed pursuant to sections 71-1555 to 71-1567 shall be provided with one or more operating smoke detectors meeting the requirements of the State Fire Marshal's rules and regulations at the time of their remodeling or sale. In the event of a sale, the provision of smoke detectors shall be the sole responsibility of the seller, which responsibility shall not be assigned or imputed to any other party or the agent of any party to the sale.

Laws 1981, LB 296, § 11;

Laws 1985, LB 313, § 29.